New Jersey, session 221, A5076.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a. The Superintendent of State Police shall establish a 1[maternity] recovery leave1 policy applicable to State troopers who present proof of pregnancy. At a minimum, the 1[maternity] recovery1 leave policy established pursuant to this section shall: (1)  establish at least eight weeks of continuous 1[maternity]1 recovery leave after giving birth, with full pay and benefits, without the recovery leave being considered sick leave or deducted from sick leave balances; and (2)  not subject a trooper to residency restrictions or integrity checks, which may be applicable to sick or other medical leave, during the period of 1[maternity]1 recovery leave. b.   The superintendent shall make available information concerning the 1[maternity] recovery leave1 policy established pursuant to this section on the intranet website maintained by the Division of State Police. The information shall include, at a minimum, applicable policies and forms that are required to be completed before and after a period of recovery leave is taken; frequently asked questions; and contact information that allows a trooper to inquire about the divisions 1[maternity] recovery leave1 policy. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.